Louisiana, session 2026, HB644.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:176(G) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§176. Extracurricular activities; interscholastic athletics; participation; standards;
prohibitions; filming or videotaping; definitions
* * *
G. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no public school or
nonpublic school that receives state funds may be a member of, or participate in any
competition sponsored by, any intrastate interscholastic extracurricular athletic
association or organization that does not provide for the following relative to
eligibility to participate in interscholastic athletics for students in grades seven
through twelve:
(1) An otherwise eligible student who has not previously been enrolled in
any member school is eligible to participate without delay upon enrollment in a
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-210 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 644
member school. For purposes of this Subsection, a "member school" is a school that
participates in such competition.
(2) An otherwise eligible student may transfer from one member school to
another without delay in eligibility to participate as follows:
(a) He may transfer to the public school to which he would be assigned
based on the attendance zone designated by the city, parish, or other local school
board of the school system in which the student resides, referred to in this
Subparagraph as his "home school". He shall be immediately eligible to participate
at his home school regardless of grade level or previous transfers as provided in
Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph or any other previous transfers.
(b) He may transfer to any other member school, public or nonpublic,
subject to the following limitations:
(i) He may use this transfer option only one time unless otherwise
authorized.
(ii) He may transfer only through the completion of his eleventh grade year
and only if the transfer request is submitted on or before the final day of student
attendance of the school year at the school where he is enrolled.